Illinois, session 104th, SB1831.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 18-165 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-165)7    Sec. 18-165. Abatement of taxes. 8    (a) Any taxing district, upon a majority vote of its 9governing authority, may, after the determination of the 10assessed valuation of its property, order the clerk of that 11county to abate any portion of its taxes on the following types 12of property:13        (1) Commercial and industrial.14            (A) The property of any commercial or industrial 15        firm, including but not limited to the property of (i) 16        any firm that is used for collecting, separating, 17        storing, or processing recyclable materials, locating 18        within the taxing district during the immediately 19        preceding year from another state, territory, or 20        country, or having been newly created within this 21        State during the immediately preceding year, or 22        expanding an existing facility, or (ii) any firm that 23        is used for the generation and transmission of   SB1831- 2 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1        electricity locating within the taxing district during 2        the immediately preceding year or expanding its 3        presence within the taxing district during the 4        immediately preceding year by construction of a new 5        electric generating facility that uses natural gas as 6        its fuel, or any firm that is used for production 7        operations at a new, expanded, or reopened coal mine 8        within the taxing district, that has been certified as 9        a High Impact Business by the Illinois Department of 10        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. The property of any 11        firm used for the generation and transmission of 12        electricity shall include all property of the firm 13        used for transmission facilities as defined in Section 14        5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. The abatement 15        shall not exceed a period of 10 years and the aggregate 16        amount of abated taxes for all taxing districts 17        combined shall not exceed $4,000,000.18            (A-5) Any property in the taxing district of a new 19        electric generating facility, as defined in Section 20        605-332 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 21        Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 22        Illinois. The abatement shall not exceed a period of 23        10 years. The abatement shall be subject to the 24        following limitations:25                (i) if the equalized assessed valuation of the 26            new electric generating facility is equal to or   SB1831- 3 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1            greater than $25,000,000 but less than 2            $50,000,000, then the abatement may not exceed (i) 3            over the entire term of the abatement, 5% of the 4            taxing district's aggregate taxes from the new 5            electric generating facility and (ii) in any one 6            year of abatement, 20% of the taxing district's 7            taxes from the new electric generating facility;8                (ii) if the equalized assessed valuation of 9            the new electric generating facility is equal to 10            or greater than $50,000,000 but less than 11            $75,000,000, then the abatement may not exceed (i) 12            over the entire term of the abatement, 10% of the 13            taxing district's aggregate taxes from the new 14            electric generating facility and (ii) in any one 15            year of abatement, 35% of the taxing district's 16            taxes from the new electric generating facility;17                (iii) if the equalized assessed valuation of 18            the new electric generating facility is equal to 19            or greater than $75,000,000 but less than 20            $100,000,000, then the abatement may not exceed 21            (i) over the entire term of the abatement, 20% of 22            the taxing district's aggregate taxes from the new 23            electric generating facility and (ii) in any one 24            year of abatement, 50% of the taxing district's 25            taxes from the new electric generating facility;26                (iv) if the equalized assessed valuation of   SB1831- 4 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1            the new electric generating facility is equal to 2            or greater than $100,000,000 but less than 3            $125,000,000, then the abatement may not exceed 4            (i) over the entire term of the abatement, 30% of 5            the taxing district's aggregate taxes from the new 6            electric generating facility and (ii) in any one 7            year of abatement, 60% of the taxing district's 8            taxes from the new electric generating facility;9                (v) if the equalized assessed valuation of the 10            new electric generating facility is equal to or 11            greater than $125,000,000 but less than 12            $150,000,000, then the abatement may not exceed 13            (i) over the entire term of the abatement, 40% of 14            the taxing district's aggregate taxes from the new 15            electric generating facility and (ii) in any one 16            year of abatement, 60% of the taxing district's 17            taxes from the new electric generating facility;18                (vi) if the equalized assessed valuation of 19            the new electric generating facility is equal to 20            or greater than $150,000,000, then the abatement 21            may not exceed (i) over the entire term of the 22            abatement, 50% of the taxing district's aggregate 23            taxes from the new electric generating facility 24            and (ii) in any one year of abatement, 60% of the 25            taxing district's taxes from the new electric 26            generating facility.  SB1831- 5 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1            The abatement is not effective unless the owner of 2        the new electric generating facility agrees to repay 3        to the taxing district all amounts previously abated, 4        together with interest computed at the rate and in the 5        manner provided for delinquent taxes, in the event 6        that the owner of the new electric generating facility 7        closes the new electric generating facility before the 8        expiration of the entire term of the abatement.9            The authorization of taxing districts to abate 10        taxes under this subdivision (a)(1)(A-5) expires on 11        January 1, 2010.12            (B) The property of any commercial or industrial 13        development of at least (i) 500 acres or (ii) 225 acres 14        in the case of a commercial or industrial development 15        that applies for and is granted designation as a High 16        Impact Business under paragraph (F) of item (3) of 17        subsection (a) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois 18        Enterprise Zone Act, having been created within the 19        taxing district. The abatement shall not exceed a 20        period of 20 years and the aggregate amount of abated 21        taxes for all taxing districts combined shall not 22        exceed $12,000,000.23            (C) The property of any commercial or industrial 24        firm currently located in the taxing district that 25        expands a facility or its number of employees. The 26        abatement shall not exceed a period of 10 years and the   SB1831- 6 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1        aggregate amount of abated taxes for all taxing 2        districts combined shall not exceed $4,000,000. The 3        abatement period may be renewed at the option of the 4        taxing districts.5        (2) Horse racing. Any property in the taxing district 6    which is used for the racing of horses and upon which 7    capital improvements consisting of expansion, improvement 8    or replacement of existing facilities have been made since 9    July 1, 1987. The combined abatements for such property 10    from all taxing districts in any county shall not exceed 11    $5,000,000 annually and shall not exceed a period of 10 12    years.13        (3) Auto racing. Any property designed exclusively for 14    the racing of motor vehicles. Such abatement shall not 15    exceed a period of 10 years.16        (4) Academic or research institute. The property of 17    any academic or research institute in the taxing district 18    that (i) is an exempt organization under paragraph (3) of 19    Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) operates 20    for the benefit of the public by actually and exclusively 21    performing scientific research and making the results of 22    the research available to the interested public on a 23    non-discriminatory basis, and (iii) employs more than 100 24    employees. An abatement granted under this paragraph shall 25    be for at least 15 years and the aggregate amount of abated 26    taxes for all taxing districts combined shall not exceed   SB1831- 7 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1    $5,000,000.2        (5) Housing for older persons. Any property in the 3    taxing district that is devoted exclusively to affordable 4    housing for older households. For purposes of this 5    paragraph, "older households" means those households (i) 6    living in housing provided under any State or federal 7    program that the Department of Human Rights determines is 8    specifically designed and operated to assist elderly 9    persons and is solely occupied by persons 55 years of age 10    or older and (ii) whose annual income does not exceed 80% 11    of the area gross median income, adjusted for family size, 12    as such gross income and median income are determined from 13    time to time by the United States Department of Housing 14    and Urban Development. The abatement shall not exceed a 15    period of 15 years, and the aggregate amount of abated 16    taxes for all taxing districts shall not exceed 17    $3,000,000.18        (6) Historical society. For assessment years 1998 19    through 2018, the property of an historical society 20    qualifying as an exempt organization under Section 21    501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.22        (7) Recreational facilities. Any property in the 23    taxing district (i) that is used for a municipal airport, 24    (ii) that is subject to a leasehold assessment under 25    Section 9-195 of this Code and (iii) which is sublet from a 26    park district that is leasing the property from a   SB1831- 8 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1    municipality, but only if the property is used exclusively 2    for recreational facilities or for parking lots used 3    exclusively for those facilities. The abatement shall not 4    exceed a period of 10 years.5        (8) Relocated corporate headquarters. If approval 6    occurs within 5 years after the effective date of this 7    amendatory Act of the 92nd General Assembly, any property 8    or a portion of any property in a taxing district that is 9    used by an eligible business for a corporate headquarters 10    as defined in the Corporate Headquarters Relocation Act. 11    Instead of an abatement under this paragraph (8), a taxing 12    district may enter into an agreement with an eligible 13    business to make annual payments to that eligible business 14    in an amount not to exceed the property taxes paid 15    directly or indirectly by that eligible business to the 16    taxing district and any other taxing districts for 17    premises occupied pursuant to a written lease and may make 18    those payments without the need for an annual 19    appropriation. No school district, however, may enter into 20    an agreement with, or abate taxes for, an eligible 21    business unless the municipality in which the corporate 22    headquarters is located agrees to provide funding to the 23    school district in an amount equal to the amount abated or 24    paid by the school district as provided in this paragraph 25    (8). Any abatement ordered or agreement entered into under 26    this paragraph (8) may be effective for the entire term   SB1831- 9 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1    specified by the taxing district, except the term of the 2    abatement or annual payments may not exceed 20 years.3        (9) United States Military Public/Private Residential 4    Developments. Each building, structure, or other 5    improvement designed, financed, constructed, renovated, 6    managed, operated, or maintained after January 1, 2006 7    under a "PPV Lease", as set forth under Division 14 of 8    Article 10, and any such PPV Lease. 9        (10) Property located in a business corridor that 10    qualifies for an abatement under Section 18-184.10. 11        (11) Under Section 11-15.4-25 of the Illinois 12    Municipal Code, property located within an urban 13    agricultural area that is used by a qualifying farmer for 14    processing, growing, raising, or otherwise producing 15    agricultural products. 16        (12) Property included in a new residential 17    construction development, as determined by the taxing 18    district, that is located in a county with fewer than 19    300,000 inhabitants. 20    (b) Upon a majority vote of its governing authority, any 21municipality may, after the determination of the assessed 22valuation of its property, order the county clerk to abate any 23portion of its taxes on any property that is located within the 24corporate limits of the municipality in accordance with 25Section 8-3-18 of the Illinois Municipal Code.26(Source: P.A. 100-1133, eff. 1-1-19.)   SB1831- 10 -LRB104 03834 HLH 13858 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.